Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.010

Legislative declaration.

The history, economy, culture, and the future of Washington state to a large degree all involve agriculture. In order to develop and promote Washington's agricultural products as part of the existing comprehensive scheme to regulate agricultural commodities, the legislature declares:

(1) That the marketing of wheat and barley produced in Washington is in the public interest. It is vital to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their general welfare that wheat and barley produced in Washington are properly promoted by:

(a) Enabling wheat producers and barley producers to help themselves in establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing, grading, and standardizing of the grains they produce; and

(b) Working towards stabilizing the agricultural industries by increasing consumption of wheat and barley within the state, the nation, and internationally;

(2) That the wheat and barley industries operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and that includes restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the agricultural producer's ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(3) That it is in the overriding public interest that support for the wheat and barley industries be clearly expressed, that adequate protection be given to the industries and their activities and operations, and that wheat and barley be promoted individually and as part of a comprehensive agricultural industry to:

(a) Enhance the reputation and image of Washington state's wheat and barley;

(b) Increase the sale and use of Washington state's wheat and barley in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the production of Washington state's wheat and barley;

(d) Increase the knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of Washington state's wheat and barley and wheat and barley products;

(e) Support and engage in programs or activities that benefit the planting, production, harvesting, handling, processing, marketing, and uses of wheat and barley produced in Washington state;

(4) That the commission is established primarily for the benefit of the people of the state of Washington and its economy. By enacting this chapter, the legislature hereby charges the commission, with oversight by the director, to speak on behalf of the Washington state government with regard to wheat and barley production in Washington and issues related to the wheat and barley industry in Washington; and

(5) That this chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purposes of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

[ 2009 c 33 s 1.]